District of Columbia statutes.
29-308.09

Effect of amendment.

An amendment to the articles of incorporation shall not affect a cause of action existing against or in favor of the corporation, a proceeding to which the corporation is a party, or the existing rights of persons other than shareholders of the corporation. An amendment changing a corporation’s name shall not abate a proceeding brought by or against the corporation in its former name.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720